Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.405.265

Rights of certificated employees in school districts dissolved due to financial insolvency.

Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 28A.405.210 through 28A.405.380, the employment status, the processes for notices of discharge or nonrenewal, and the appeal rights of certificated employees in school districts that are dissolved due to financial insolvency shall be as provided in RCW 28A.315.229.

[ 2012 c 186 s 21.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 186: See note following RCW 28A.315.025.

Rule-making authority—2012 c 186: See RCW 28A.315.902.